Arkansas, session 2025, SB518.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-268-104 is amended to read as follows:
14-268-104. Authority to adopt measures.
(a) In addition to all other powers, and notwithstanding any provision
of any other law, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, each
city, town, or county in this state is authorized to enact, adopt, and
enforce ordinances, building or zoning codes, or other appropriate measures
regulating, restricting, or controlling the management and use of land,
structures, and other developments in flood-prone areas.
(b) The measures, in addition to all other matters, may:
*SSS217*
03/19/2025 8:12:06 AM SSS217

SB518
(1) Restrict the development and use of land which is exposed to
flood damage;
(2) To the extent possible, guide the development of proposed
construction away from locations threatened by flood hazards;
(3) Prescribe assistance in reducing flood damage;
(4) Require flood-proofing of structures which are permitted to
remain in, or are to be constructed in, flood-prone areas;
(5) Prescribe regulation of the types, purposes, and uses of
structures, buildings, developments, or fills permitted to be erected or
improved in flood-prone areas;
(6) Require drainage and such other action as is feasible to
minimize flooding; and
(7) Assure the adequacy of sewerage and water systems that may
be affected by flooding.
(c) A city, town, or county shall not adopt an ordinance, building or
zoning code, or other measure to regulate, restrict, or control the
management and use of land, structures, or other developments in an area
designated by the Federal Emergency Management Agency as a special flood
hazard area that is more restrictive than the specific guidelines by flood
zone under the National Flood Insurance Program, 42 U.S.C. § 4011 et seq., as
it existed on January 1, 2025, without compensation for diminution in value
of the special flood hazard area.














03/19/2025 8:12:06 AM SSS217